Hawaii statutes.
§291C-148 Driving upon sidewalk. (a)
Except as provided in subsection (b), no person shall drive any vehicle upon a
sidewalk or sidewalk area except upon a permanent or authorized temporary
driveway.

(b) Unless otherwise prohibited, a bicycle may
be driven at a speed of ten miles per hour or less on a sidewalk or sidewalk
area; provided that the driver of the bicycle shall yield the right-of-way to
any pedestrian and that bicycle riding shall be prohibited on sidewalks in
business districts.

(c) This section shall not be construed as
preempting the director of transportation's or counties' authority to control
parking on sidewalks under section 291C-114. Nor shall this section be
construed as prohibiting the director or a county from authorizing parking on
sidewalks when the authorization is promulgated in accordance with section
291C-114. [L 1984, c 273, §15; am L 1988, c 191, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next